dictionaries/he_IL/he_IL.aff
FLAG num
SFX  13460 Y 1
SFX  13460 ן נסת/64993 .
SFX  7294 Y 1
SFX  7294 0 שון/64992 .
SFX  12418 Y 1
SFX  12418 0 לתי/64991 .
SFX  6212 Y 1
SFX  6212 0 לתי/64992 .
SFX  7076 Y 1
SFX  7076 0 לתי/64993 .
SFX  6974 Y 1
SFX  6974 0 ליותייך/64993 .
SFX  12903 Y 1
SFX  12903 0 ימותיכם/64991 .
SFX  13061 Y 1
SFX  13061 ח יל/64991 .
SFX  7313 Y 1
SFX  7313 0 רתיה/64992 .
SFX  7727 Y 1
SFX  7727 ח יל/64992 .
SFX  10901 Y 1
SFX  10901 ח יל/64993 .
SFX  12496 Y 1
SFX  12496 0 ידתו/64991 .
SFX  10951 Y 1
SFX  10951 0 בותם/64992 .
SFX  10849 Y 1
SFX  10849 0 ידתו/64992 .
SFX  5972 Y 1
SFX  5972 0 בותם/64993 .
SFX  13420 Y 1
SFX  13420 0 ידתו/64993 .
SFX  11840 Y 1
SFX  11840 ח ידכם/64992 .
SFX  7975 Y 1
SFX  7975 0 עתכם/64991 .
SFX  12030 Y 1
SFX  12030 0 יבתנו/64991 .
SFX  9996 Y 1
SFX  9996 0 עתכם/64992 .
SFX  12363 Y 1
SFX  12363 0 גכן/64991 .
SFX  10650 Y 1
SFX  10650 0 יבתנו/64992 .
SFX  8536 Y 1
SFX  8536 0 עתכם/64993 .
SFX  6045 Y 1
SFX  6045 0 גכן/64992 .
SFX  7241 Y 1
SFX  7241 0 עים/64991 .
SFX  13597 Y 1
SFX  13597 0 עים/64992 .
SFX  9113 Y 1
SFX  9113 0 סיהם/64991 .
SFX  8023 Y 1
SFX  8023 0 גכן/64993 .
SFX  12554 Y 1
SFX  12554 0 יפתכן/64991 .
SFX  9993 Y 1
SFX  9993 0 עים/64994 .
SFX  6024 Y 1
SFX  6024 0 יותינו/64993 .
SFX  5302 Y 1
SFX  5302 0 סיהם/64993 .
SFX  10130 Y 1
SFX  10130 0 יפתכן/64992 .
SFX  12931 Y 1
SFX  12931 0 פס/64991 .
SFX  10536 Y 1
SFX  10536 0 גכן/64998 .
SFX  6156 Y 1
SFX  6156 0 פס/64992 .
SFX  5921 Y 1
SFX  5921 0 פס/64993 .
SFX  12891 Y 1
SFX  12891 0 ימתו/64991 .
SFX  11804 Y 1
SFX  11804 ב ובינו/64993 .
SFX  9723 Y 1
SFX  9723 0 ימתו/64992 .
SFX  6427 Y 1
SFX  6427 0 ניתכן/64993 .
SFX  9779 Y 1
SFX  9779 0 קנום/64992 .
SFX  7531 Y 1
SFX  7531 0 פותי/64993 .
SFX  11908 Y 1
SFX  11908 ח ירנה/64992 .
SFX  13866 Y 1
SFX  13866 0 דדי/64992 .
SFX  10333 Y 1
SFX  10333 0 פותי/64998 .
SFX  12802 Y 1
SFX  12802 0 דדי/64993 .
SFX  7927 Y 1
SFX  7927 0 לויותיו/64993 .
SFX  11020 Y 1
SFX  11020 0 דדי/64995 .
SFX  13072 Y 1
SFX  13072 ח יחיה/64991 .
SFX  13590 Y 1
SFX  13590 ח יחיה/64992 .
SFX  5442 Y 1
SFX  5442 ח יחיה/64993 .
SFX  9396 Y 1
SFX  9396 ח יחיה/64994 .
SFX  5515 Y 1
SFX  5515 0 נהו/64992 .
SFX  13838 Y 1
SFX  13838 0 ימיהו/64992 .
SFX  13232 Y 1
SFX  13232 0 נהו/64993 .
SFX  12025 Y 1
SFX  12025 0 יבייך/64991 .
SFX  12472 Y 1
SFX  12472 0 יבייך/64993 .
SFX  9736 Y 1
SFX  9736 0 ימיהו/64994 .
SFX  13253 Y 1
SFX  13253 ו חם/64991 .
SFX  8097 Y 1
SFX  8097 ו חם/64992 .
SFX  11410 Y 1
SFX  11410 ו חם/64993 .
SFX  11535 Y 1
SFX  11535 0 כיכם/64991 .
SFX  13734 Y 1
SFX  13734 0 כיכם/64992 .
SFX  12952 Y 1
SFX  12952 ן נאם/64993 .
SFX  10583 Y 1
SFX  10583 ו חם/64998 .
SFX  5761 Y 1
SFX  5761 0 ז/64991 .
SFX  5253 Y 1
SFX  5253 0 ז/64992 .
SFX  5671 Y 1
SFX  5671 0 כיכם/64993 .
SFX  7103 Y 1
SFX  7103 0 קון/64991 .
SFX  10151 Y 1
SFX  10151 0 קון/64992 .
SFX  8530 Y 1
SFX  8530 0 ז/64993 .
SFX  10703 Y 1
SFX  10703 0 ז/64994 .
SFX  9145 Y 1
SFX  9145 0 רכן/64991 .
SFX  13474 Y 1
SFX  13474 0 קון/64994 .
SFX  5061 Y 1
SFX  5061 0 רכן/64992 .
SFX  13548 Y 1
SFX  13548 0 מיני/64992 .
SFX  5461 Y 1
SFX  5461 0 רכן/64993 .
SFX  13367 Y 1
SFX  13367 0 ז/64997 .
SFX  9268 Y 1
SFX  9268 0 מיני/64994 .
SFX  8276 Y 1
SFX  8276 0 עתך/64991 .
SFX  11617 Y 1
SFX  11617 ל ני/64991 .
SFX  9997 Y 1
SFX  9997 0 עתך/64992 .
SFX  11081 Y 1
SFX  11081 ל ני/64992 .
SFX  8537 Y 1
SFX  8537 0 עתך/64993 .
SFX  6769 Y 1
SFX  6769 0 רכן/64998 .
SFX  7116 Y 1
SFX  7116 ל ני/64993 .
SFX  11444 Y 1
SFX  11444 ל ני/64994 .
SFX  6822 Y 1
SFX  6822 ל ני/64995 .
SFX  13270 Y 1
SFX  13270 ל ני/64997 .
SFX  11816 Y 1
SFX  11816 ל ני/64998 .
SFX  7383 Y 1
SFX  7383 ה וש/64992 .
SFX  12307 Y 1
SFX  12307 0 ילותיהם/64991 .
SFX  8778 Y 1
SFX  8778 0 ילותיהם/64993 .
SFX  9729 Y 1
SFX  9729 0 ימוך/64992 .
SFX  7766 Y 1
SFX  7766 ם מיה/64993 .
SFX  8265 Y 1
SFX  8265 0 מיכם/64991 .
SFX  13546 Y 1
SFX  13546 0 מיכם/64992 .
SFX  12336 Y 1
SFX  12336 0 דתו/64991 .
SFX  6954 Y 1
SFX  6954 0 וייכן/64993 .
SFX  6149 Y 1
SFX  6149 0 מיכם/64993 .
SFX  8892 Y 1
SFX  8892 0 דתו/64992 .
SFX  5540 Y 1
SFX  5540 0 רותו/64993 .
SFX  7607 Y 1
SFX  7607 0 דתו/64993 .
SFX  13136 Y 1
SFX  13136 ט ירנו/64991 .
SFX  8311 Y 1
SFX  8311 0 אותנו/64993 .
SFX  7876 Y 1
SFX  7876 ט ירנו/64992 .
SFX  11130 Y 1
SFX  11130 ט ירנו/64993 .
SFX  10733 Y 1
SFX  10733 0 יחוה/64992 .
SFX  8065 Y 1
SFX  8065 ה ונכם/64993 .
SFX  12813 Y 1
SFX  12813 0 ררות/64991 .
SFX  8867 Y 1
SFX  8867 ד וריך/64993 .
SFX  10870 Y 1
SFX  10870 0 ידוכן/64992 .
SFX  5998 Y 1
SFX  5998 0 שותי/64993 .
SFX  6164 Y 1
SFX  6164 0 כן/64991 .
SFX  5006 Y 1
SFX  5006 0 כן/64992 .
SFX  5346 Y 1
SFX  5346 0 כן/64993 .
SFX  12670 Y 1
SFX  12670 0 יטה/64991 .
SFX  9496 Y 1
SFX  9496 0 יעוכן/64992 .
SFX  5084 Y 1
SFX  5084 0 כן/64996 .
SFX  5613 Y 1
SFX  5613 0 יטה/64992 .
SFX  9422 Y 1
SFX  9422 0 יטה/64993 .
SFX  5845 Y 1
SFX  5845 0 כן/64998 .
SFX  13096 Y 1
SFX  13096 0 וגיהם/64991 .
SFX  6835 Y 1
SFX  6835 0 כן/64999 .
SFX  8187 Y 1
SFX  8187 0 וגיהם/64993 .
SFX  8134 Y 1
SFX  8134 ב דד/64992 .
SFX  10196 Y 1
SFX  10196 0 יטה/64999 .
SFX  9125 Y 1
SFX  9125 0 סותייך/64991 .
SFX  7844 Y 1
SFX  7844 0 סותייך/64993 .
SFX  8879 Y 1
SFX  8879 ד יקכם/64993 .
SFX  12018 Y 1
SFX  12018 0 יביכן/64991 .
SFX  13778 Y 1
SFX  13778 0 יביכן/64992 .
SFX  12469 Y 1
SFX  12469 0 יביכן/64993 .
SFX  10503 Y 1
SFX  10503 ד יקכם/64998 .
SFX  9044 Y 1
SFX  9044 0 קיה/64991 .
SFX  13692 Y 1
SFX  13692 0 קיה/64992 .
SFX  9943 Y 1
SFX  9943 ך כה/64991 .
SFX  8739 Y 1
SFX  8739 ך כה/64992 .
SFX  7460 Y 1
SFX  7460 0 קיה/64993 .
SFX  12324 Y 1
SFX  12324 0 דנו/64991 .
SFX  10569 Y 1
SFX  10569 ך כה/64993 .
SFX  10143 Y 1
SFX  10143 0 קיה/64994 .
SFX  5322 Y 1
SFX  5322 0 דנו/64992 .
SFX  6987 Y 1
SFX  6987 0 דנו/64993 .
SFX  10421 Y 1
SFX  10421 ך כה/64998 .
SFX  8286 Y 1
SFX  8286 0 עותיך/64991 .
SFX  11061 Y 1
SFX  11061 ך כה/64999 .
SFX  9040 Y 1
SFX  9040 0 קתן/64991 .
SFX  8319 Y 1
SFX  8319 0 אותה/64993 .
SFX  9678 Y 1
SFX  9678 0 דנו/64998 .
SFX  8544 Y 1
SFX  8544 0 עותיך/64993 .
SFX  6095 Y 1
SFX  6095 0 קתן/64992 .
SFX  5251 Y 1
SFX  5251 0 קתן/64993 .
SFX  7070 Y 1
SFX  7070 0 דנו/64999 .
SFX  12386 Y 1
SFX  12386 0 יכנו/64991 .
SFX  5559 Y 1
SFX  5559 0 רויות/64991 .
SFX  7668 Y 1
SFX  7668 0 יכנו/64992 .
SFX  12571 Y 1
SFX  12571 ד ידך/64991 .
SFX  9325 Y 1
SFX  9325 0 יכנו/64993 .
SFX  8914 Y 1
SFX  8914 0 דתיך/64992 .
SFX  7379 Y 1
SFX  7379 ד ידך/64992 .
SFX  9917 Y 1
SFX  9917 ד ידך/64993 .
SFX  6499 Y 1
SFX  6499 ץ צע/64992 .
SFX  12801 Y 1
SFX  12801 0 ננת/64991 .
SFX  9659 Y 1
SFX  9659 0 יכנו/64998 .
SFX  10987 Y 1
SFX  10987 0 ננת/64992 .
SFX  9295 Y 1
SFX  9295 ד ידך/64998 .
SFX  7332 Y 1
SFX  7332 0 ומנו/64993 .
SFX  6004 Y 1
SFX  6004 0 קותכן/64993 .
SFX  13718 Y 1
SFX  13718 ל מרי/64992 .
SFX  13164 Y 1
SFX  13164 ל מרי/64993 .
SFX  8406 Y 1
SFX  8406 ו יתה/64992 .
SFX  11559 Y 1
SFX  11559 0 בתן/64991 .
SFX  7658 Y 1
SFX  7658 ו יתה/64993 .
SFX  10457 Y 1
SFX  10457 ל מרי/64995 .
SFX  8159 Y 1
SFX  8159 0 בתן/64992 .
SFX  6295 Y 1
SFX  6295 0 בתן/64993 .
SFX  6586 Y 1
SFX  6586 0 וות/64991 .
SFX  5890 Y 1
SFX  5890 0 פוה/64992 .
SFX  10299 Y 1
SFX  10299 0 סוך/64992 .
SFX  11776 Y 1
SFX  11776 ח יב/64992 .
SFX  9536 Y 1
SFX  9536 0 עתיך/64992 .
SFX  13879 Y 1
SFX  13879 י כלי/64992 .
SFX  12717 Y 1
SFX  12717 י כלי/64993 .
SFX  11056 Y 1
SFX  11056 י כלי/64995 .
SFX  11851 Y 1
SFX  11851 ח ידוהו/64992 .
SFX  7643 Y 1
SFX  7643 0 צותנו/64993 .
SFX  8171 Y 1
SFX  8171 0 וגים/64991 .
SFX  12850 Y 1
SFX  12850 0 יקתכן/64991 .
SFX  9788 Y 1
SFX  9788 0 יקתכן/64992 .
SFX  13447 Y 1
SFX  13447 0 יקתכן/64993 .
SFX  11537 Y 1
SFX  11537 0 כותיכן/64991 .
SFX  6056 Y 1
SFX  6056 0 ויותיך/64993 .
SFX  11654 Y 1
SFX  11654 0 קתי/64991 .
SFX  13647 Y 1
SFX  13647 ו ילון/64992 .
SFX  9307 Y 1
SFX  9307 0 כותיכן/64993 .
SFX  6097 Y 1
SFX  6097 0 קתי/64992 .
SFX  11074 Y 1
SFX  11074 0 בוהו/64992 .
SFX  9213 Y 1
SFX  9213 0 שני/64991 .
SFX  5256 Y 1
SFX  5256 0 קתי/64993 .
SFX  7286 Y 1
SFX  7286 0 שני/64992 .
SFX  9693 Y 1
SFX  9693 0 שני/64993 .
SFX  5573 Y 1
SFX  5573 0 ונותכם/64993 .
SFX  6919 Y 1
SFX  6919 ד ודו/64993 .
SFX  9371 Y 1
SFX  9371 ל נות/64991 .
SFX  12436 Y 1
SFX  12436 0 דל/64991 .
SFX  5315 Y 1
SFX  5315 0 דל/64992 .
SFX  11285 Y 1
SFX  11285 0 דל/64993 .
SFX  9861 Y 1
SFX  9861 י נו/64991 .
SFX  12653 Y 1
SFX  12653 0 גש/64991 .
SFX  7917 Y 1
SFX  7917 י נו/64992 .
SFX  6160 Y 1
SFX  6160 0 גש/64992 .
SFX  5367 Y 1
SFX  5367 י נו/64993 .
SFX  11468 Y 1
SFX  11468 0 גש/64993 .
SFX  6565 Y 1
SFX  6565 0 ידהו/64992 .
SFX  6418 Y 1
SFX  6418 0 ניותיי/64993 .
SFX  13254 Y 1
SFX  13254 י נו/64997 .
SFX  5904 Y 1
SFX  5904 0 ופכן/64993 .
SFX  5051 Y 1
SFX  5051 ך ככן/64992 .
SFX  7424 Y 1
SFX  7424 י נו/64998 .
SFX  8972 Y 1
SFX  8972 0 איותיכן/64993 .
SFX  7902 Y 1
SFX  7902 י נו/64999 .
SFX  10265 Y 1
SFX  10265 ץ צתני/64992 .
SFX  8282 Y 1
SFX  8282 0 עותיי/64991 .
SFX  10417 Y 1
SFX  10417 ך ככן/64998 .
SFX  8540 Y 1
SFX  8540 0 עותיי/64993 .
SFX  8996 Y 1
SFX  8996 ב ים/64991 .
SFX  12290 Y 1
SFX  12290 0 ירותיו/64991 .
SFX  7442 Y 1
SFX  7442 ב ים/64992 .
SFX  10266 Y 1
SFX  10266 ב ים/64993 .
SFX  13048 Y 1
SFX  13048 0 ירותיו/64993 .
SFX  12874 Y 1
SFX  12874 ב ים/64994 .
SFX  12460 Y 1
SFX  12460 0 לף/64991 .
SFX  5779 Y 1
SFX  5779 0 לף/64992 .
SFX  5958 Y 1
SFX  5958 0 לף/64993 .
SFX  7585 Y 1
SFX  7585 0 ציותייך/64993 .
SFX  9465 Y 1
SFX  9465 0 יעום/64992 .
SFX  6780 Y 1
SFX  6780 0 דותה/64993 .
SFX  11671 Y 1
SFX  11671 0 אלי/64991 .
SFX  13784 Y 1
SFX  13784 0 אלי/64992 .
SFX  12953 Y 1
SFX  12953 ן סות/64991 .
SFX  12702 Y 1
SFX  12702 0 אלי/64993 .
SFX  13399 Y 1
SFX  13399 0 דון/64991 .
SFX  12178 Y 1
SFX  12178 0 חותינו/64991 .
SFX  8897 Y 1
SFX  8897 0 דון/64992 .
SFX  13439 Y 1
SFX  13439 0 דון/64993 .
SFX  13159 Y 1
SFX  13159 0 יצים/64991 .
SFX  11659 Y 1
SFX  11659 ן נם/64991 .
SFX  13931 Y 1
SFX  13931 0 יצים/64992 .
SFX  12188 Y 1
SFX  12188 0 יח/64991 .
SFX  5048 Y 1
SFX  5048 ן נם/64992 .
SFX  6539 Y 1
SFX  6539 0 חותינו/64993 .
SFX  12042 Y 1
SFX  12042 0 יבותיו/64991 .
SFX  6338 Y 1
SFX  6338 ן נם/64993 .
SFX  5603 Y 1
SFX  5603 0 יח/64992 .
SFX  10872 Y 1
SFX  10872 0 יצים/64994 .
SFX  9413 Y 1
SFX  9413 0 יח/64993 .
SFX  6389 Y 1
SFX  6389 ו טיות/64991 .
SFX  7865 Y 1
SFX  7865 ן נם/64998 .
SFX  7900 Y 1
SFX  7900 0 פרות/64991 .
SFX  13338 Y 1
SFX  13338 ן ער/64992 .
SFX  5963 Y 1
SFX  5963 0 ש/64991 .
SFX  5074 Y 1
SFX  5074 0 ש/64992 .
SFX  7049 Y 1
SFX  7049 0 ש/64993 .
SFX  9351 Y 1
SFX  9351 0 ש/64994 .
SFX  8982 Y 1
SFX  8982 0 ש/64996 .
SFX  8513 Y 1
SFX  8513 0 ש/64997 .
SFX  6486 Y 1
SFX  6486 0 וריו/64993 .
SFX  9846 Y 1
SFX  9846 0 מרו/64992 .
SFX  13391 Y 1
SFX  13391 0 מרו/64993 .
SFX  7803 Y 1
SFX  7803 0 א/64991 .
SFX  9551 Y 1
SFX  9551 0 ענוך/64992 .
SFX  5247 Y 1
SFX  5247 0 א/64992 .
SFX  7204 Y 1
SFX  7204 0 נויותיכם/64993 .
SFX  6178 Y 1
SFX  6178 0 תה/64991 .
SFX  7545 Y 1
SFX  7545 0 א/64993 .
SFX  5375 Y 1
SFX  5375 0 תה/64992 .
SFX  10182 Y 1
SFX  10182 0 א/64994 .
SFX  5097 Y 1
SFX  5097 0 תה/64993 .
SFX  12348 Y 1
SFX  12348 0 דתני/64991 .
SFX  6408 Y 1
SFX  6408 0 יניות/64991 .
SFX  11986 Y 1
SFX  11986 0 צותיהן/64991 .
SFX  11591 Y 1
SFX  11591 0 א/64996 .
SFX  8898 Y 1
SFX  8898 0 דתני/64992 .
SFX  10445 Y 1
SFX  10445 0 א/64997 .
SFX  10071 Y 1
SFX  10071 0 מרו/64999 .
SFX  8385 Y 1
SFX  8385 0 תה/64996 .
SFX  10834 Y 1
SFX  10834 0 צותיהן/64993 .
SFX  5208 Y 1
SFX  5208 0 תה/64998 .
SFX  13968 Y 1
SFX  13968 ו חלי/64992 .
SFX  6613 Y 1
SFX  6613 0 תה/64999 .
SFX  8810 Y 1
SFX  8810 0 לתיך/64992 .
SFX  7522 Y 1
SFX  7522 0 לותו/64993 .
SFX  10851 Y 1
SFX  10851 0 ידוני/64992 .
SFX  10250 Y 1
SFX  10250 0 אוני/64992 .
SFX  12034 Y 1
SFX  12034 0 יבתו/64991 .
SFX  9231 Y 1
SFX  9231 0 אוני/64993 .
SFX  9163 Y 1
SFX  9163 0 רתו/64991 .
SFX  7257 Y 1
SFX  7257 0 פיות/64991 .
SFX  10654 Y 1
SFX  10654 0 יבתו/64992 .
SFX  7271 Y 1
SFX  7271 0 רתו/64992 .
SFX  10262 Y 1
SFX  10262 ץ צתכם/64992 .
SFX  9037 Y 1
SFX  9037 0 פכן/64991 .
SFX  5747 Y 1
SFX  5747 0 רתו/64993 .
